Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-412
Change of venue in local actions involving real estate; transfer and entry of judgment.

When an action affecting the title or possession of real estate has been brought in or transferred to any court of a county, other than the county in which the real estate or some portion of it is situated, the clerk of such court must, after final judgment therein, certify such judgment under his or her seal of office, and transmit the same to the corresponding court of the county in which the real estate affected by the action is situated. The clerk receiving such copy must file and record such judgment in the records of the court, briefly designating it as a judgment transferred from ......... court (naming the proper court).

G.S.1873, c. 57, § 4, p. 712;

R.S.1913, § 7623;

C.S.1922, § 8566;

C.S.1929, § 20-412;

R.S.1943, § 25-412;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 7.